District of Columbia statutes.
29-413.03

Scope of inspection right.

(a)

A member’s agent or attorney shall have the same inspection and copying rights as the member represented.

(b)

The right to copy records under § 29-413.02 shall include, if reasonable, the right to receive copies. Copies may be provided through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the member.

(c)

The nonprofit corporation may comply at its expense with a member’s demand to inspect the record of members under § 29-413.02(b)(3) by providing the member with a list of members that was compiled no earlier than the date of the member’s demand.

(d)

The nonprofit corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge shall not exceed the estimated cost of production, reproduction, or transmission of the records.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History